Nebraska, session 109, LB301.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 4-109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
4-109 For purposes of sections 1 to 6 of this act: 4-108 to 4-113,
(1) Approved identification document means:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services employment
authorization document, such as a Form I-766 or Form I-688B;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services that (i) grants employment authorization in the United States or
(ii) is approved by the Public Employees Retirement Board;
(2) Eligible alien means an individual authorized for employment
pursuant to 8 C.F.R. 274a.12, as such regulation existed on January 1,
2025, or who was so authorized at the time of employment;
(3) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401; and
(4) Public public benefits means any grant, contract, loan,
-2-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
professional license, commercial license, welfare benefit, health payment
or financial assistance benefit, disability benefit, public or assisted
housing benefit, postsecondary education benefit involving direct payment
of financial assistance, food assistance benefit, or unemployment benefit
or any other similar benefit provided by or for which payments or
assistance are provided to an individual, a household, or a family
eligibility unit by an agency of the United States, the State of
Nebraska, or a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Section 4-108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
4-108 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, unless exempted from
verification under section 3 of this act 4-110 or pursuant to federal
law, a no state agency or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska:
(a) Shall not shall provide public benefits to a person not lawfully
present in the United States; and .
(b) Shall (2) Except as provided in section 4-110 or if exempted by
federal law, every agency or political subdivision of the State of
Nebraska shall verify the lawful presence in the United States of any
person who has applied for public benefits administered by such state an
agency or a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska.
(2) This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion,
gender, ethnicity, or national origin.
(3)(a) An eligible alien employed as, or training to become, a law
enforcement officer is entitled to any public benefits arising from or
relating to such employment or training.
(b) Such public benefits include:
(i) Retirement benefits, including pursuant to the County Employees
Retirement Act, the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act, the Police
Officers Retirement Act, and the State Employees Retirement Act;
(ii) Benefits under the Employment Security Law;
-3-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
(iii) Deferred compensation under section 84-1504;
(iv) Scholarships or financial aid for education, including pursuant
to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act; and
(v) Any other public benefit arising from or relating to such
employment or training, such that an eligible alien employed as, or
training to become, a law enforcement officer shall have access to the
same benefits that are available to any other person employed as or
training to become a law enforcement officer.
(c) Any public benefits made available to family members or
dependents of persons employed as, or training to become, law enforcement
officers, shall also be made available to family members or dependents of
eligible aliens employed as, or training to become, law enforcement
officers, without regard to the lawful presence of such family members or
dependents.
(d) The Legislature enacts this section pursuant to the authority
provided in 8 U.S.C. 1621(d), as such section existed on January 1, 2025.
(e) This subsection shall not be construed to:
(i) Redefine or alter what programs constitute a public benefit; or
(ii) Limit or eliminate a person's eligibility for any public
benefit as such eligibility existed prior to the effective date of this
act.
(4)(a) (3) No employee of a state agency or political subdivision of
the State of Nebraska shall be authorized to participate in any
retirement system, including, but not limited to, the systems provided
for in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the County Employees
Retirement Act, the Judges Retirement Act, the Nebraska State Patrol
Retirement Act, the School Employees Retirement Act, and the State
Employees Retirement Act, unless the employee is (i) a United States
citizen, (ii) or is lawfully present in the United States, or (iii) an
eligible alien employed as a law enforcement officer.
(b) The employing state agency or political subdivision of the State
-4-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
of Nebraska and the employee shall maintain at least one approved
identification document of the following documents which shall be
unexpired, if applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate such
United States citizenship, or lawful presence, or eligibility in the
United States as of the employee's date of hire. The state agency,
political subdivision, or employee shall and produce any such document so
maintained upon request of the Public Employees Retirement Board or the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
Sec. 3. Section 4-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-5-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
4-110 (1) Verification of lawful presence in the United States
pursuant to section 2 of this act 4-108 is not required for:
(a) (1) Any purpose for which lawful presence in the United States
is not restricted by law, ordinance, or regulation;
(b) (2) Assistance for health care services and products, not
related to an organ transplant procedure, that are necessary for the
treatment of an emergency medical condition, including emergency labor
and delivery, manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient
severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate
medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in (i) (a)
placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy, (ii) (b) serious
impairment to bodily functions, or (iii) (c) serious dysfunction of any
bodily organ or part;
(c) (3) Short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency disaster relief;
(d) (4) Public health assistance for immunizations with respect to
diseases and for testing and treatment of symptoms of communicable
diseases, whether or not such symptoms are caused by a communicable
disease; or
(e) (5) Programs, services, or assistance necessary for the
protection of life or safety, such as soup kitchens, crisis counseling
and intervention, and short-term shelter, which (i) (a) deliver in-kind
services at the community level, including those which deliver such
services through public or private, nonprofit agencies and (ii) (b) do
not condition the provision of assistance, the amount of assistance
provided, or the cost of assistance provided on the income or resources
of the recipient.
(2) The Legislature finds that unborn children do not have
immigration status and therefor are not within the scope of section 2 of
this act 4-108. Prenatal care services available pursuant to sections
68-915 and 68-972 to unborn children, whose eligibility is independent of
the mother's eligibility status, shall not be deemed to be tied to the
-6-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
immigration status of the mother and therefor are not included in the
restrictions imposed by section 2 of this act 4-108.
Sec. 4. Section 4-111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
4-111 (1)(a) (1) Verification of lawful presence in the United
States pursuant to section 2 of this act 4-108 requires, in addition to
any requirements imposed by section 2 of this act 4-108, that the
applicant for public benefits attest in a format prescribed by the
Department of Administrative Services that such applicant is a United
States citizen or is lawfully present in the United States.
(b) In addition to any requirements imposed by section 2 of this
act, an individual applying for public benefits described in subsection
(3) of section 2 of this act shall attest in a format prescribed by the
Department of Administrative Services that such applicant is an eligible
alien and is employed as, or training to become, a law enforcement
officer.
(2) A state agency or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations or procedures for the
electronic filing of the attestation required under subsection (1) of
this section if such attestation is substantially similar to the format
prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services.
(3)(a) The Legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the
State of Nebraska to make full use of the skills and talents in the state
by ensuring that a person who is work-authorized is able to obtain a
professional or commercial license and practice his or her profession.
(b) For purposes of a professional or commercial license, the
Legislature finds that a person not described in subdivision (1)(a)
subsection (1) of this section who submits (i) an unexpired employment
authorization document issued by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, Form I-766, and (ii) documentation issued by the United States
Department of Homeland Security, the United States Citizenship and
-7-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Immigration Services, or any other federal agency, such as one of the
types of Form I-797 used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services, demonstrating that such person is described in section 202(c)
(2)(B)(i) through (x) of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, Public Law
109-13, has demonstrated lawful presence pursuant to section 2 of this
act 4-108 and is eligible to obtain such license. Such license shall be
valid only for the period of time during which such person's employment
authorization document is valid. Nothing in this subsection shall affect
the requirements to obtain a professional or commercial license that are
unrelated to the lawful presence requirements demonstrated pursuant to
this subsection.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to grant
eligibility for any public benefits other than obtaining a professional
or commercial license.
(d) Any person who has complied with the requirements of this
subsection shall have his or her employment authorization document
verified through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements
Program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security or
an equivalent program designated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security.
(e) The Legislature enacts this subsection pursuant to the authority
provided in 8 U.S.C. 1621(d), as such section existed on January 1, 2016.
Sec. 5. Section 4-112, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
4-112 (1) For any applicant who is not a United States citizen but
who has attested that such applicant is lawfully present in the United
States or is an eligible alien as provided in section 4 of this act
4-111, eligibility for public benefits shall be verified through the
Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the
United States Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent program
designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security.
-8-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
(2) Until such verification of eligibility is made, such attestation
may be presumed to be proof of lawful presence for purposes of sections 1
to 6 of this act 4-108 to 4-113 unless such verification is required
before providing the public benefit under another provision of state or
federal law.
Sec. 6. Section 4-113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
4-113 Each state agency which administers any program of public
benefits shall provide an annual report not later than January 31 for the
prior year to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature with respect
to compliance with sections 1 to 6 of this act 4-108 to 4-113. The report
submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
total number of applicants for benefits and the number of applicants
rejected pursuant to such sections.
Sec. 7. Section 23-2306, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
23-2306 (1) The membership of the retirement system shall be
composed of all persons who are or were employed by member counties and
who maintain an account balance with the retirement system.
(2) The following employees of member counties are authorized to
participate in the retirement system: (a) All permanent full-time
employees who have attained the age of eighteen years shall begin
participation in the retirement system upon employment and full-time
elected officials shall begin participation in the retirement system upon
taking office, (b) all permanent part-time employees who have attained
the age of eighteen years may exercise the option to begin participation
in the retirement system within the first thirty days of employment, and
(c) all part-time elected officials may exercise the option to begin
participation in the retirement system within thirty days after taking
office. An employee who exercises the option to begin participation in
-9-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
the retirement system shall remain in the system until termination or
retirement, regardless of any change of status as a permanent or
temporary employee.
(3)(a) (3) No employee of a member county shall be authorized to
participate in the retirement system provided for in the County Employees
Retirement Act unless the employee is (i) a United States citizen, (ii)
or is lawfully present in the United States, or (iii) an eligible alien
employed as a law enforcement officer, as such terms are defined in
section 1 of this act.
(b) The employing member county and the employee shall maintain at
least one approved identification document, as defined in section 1 of
this act, of the following documents which shall be unexpired, if
applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate such United States
citizenship, or lawful presence, or eligibility in the United States as
of the employee's date of hire. The county or employee shall and produce
any such document so maintained upon request of the retirement board or
the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
-10-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the retirement board.
(4)(a) The board may determine that a governmental entity currently
participating in the retirement system no longer qualifies, in whole or
in part, under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code as a
participating employer in a governmental plan.
(b)(i) To aid governmental entities in their business decisionmaking
process, any governmental entity currently participating in the
retirement system contemplating a business transaction that may result in
such entity no longer qualifying, in whole or in part, under section
414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code may notify the board in writing as
soon as reasonably practicable, but no later than one hundred eighty days
before the transaction is to occur.
(ii) The board when timely notified shall, as soon as is reasonably
practicable, obtain from its contracted actuary the cost of any actuarial
study necessary to determine the potential funding obligation. The board
shall notify the entity of such cost.
(iii) If such entity pays the board's contracted actuary pursuant to
subdivision (4)(c)(vi) of this section for any actuarial study necessary
to determine the potential funding obligation, the board shall, as soon
as reasonably practicable following its receipt of the actuarial study,
(A) determine whether the entity's contemplated business transaction will
cause the entity to no longer qualify under section 414(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code, (B) determine whether the contemplated business
transaction constitutes a plan termination by the entity, (C) determine
the potential funding obligation, (D) determine the administrative costs
-11-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
that will be incurred by the board or the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's removal from the
retirement system, and (E) notify the entity of such determinations.
(iv) Failure to timely notify the board pursuant to subdivision (4)
(b)(i) of this section may result in the entity being treated as though
the board made a decision pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
(c) If the board makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (4)
(a) of this section, or if the entity engages in the contemplated
business transaction reviewed under subdivision (4)(b) of this section
that results in the entity no longer qualifying under section 414(d) of
the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) The board shall notify the entity that it no longer qualifies
under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code within ten business
days after the determination;
(ii) The affected plan members shall be immediately considered fully
vested;
(iii) The affected plan members shall become inactive within ninety
days after the board's determination;
(iv) The entity shall pay to the County Employees Retirement Fund an
amount equal to any funding obligation;
(v) The entity shall pay to the County Employees Cash Balance
Retirement Expense Fund an amount equal to any administrative costs
incurred by the board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems
in connection with the entity's removal from the retirement system; and
(vi) The entity shall pay directly to the board's contracted actuary
an amount equal to the cost of any actuarial study necessary to aid the
board in determining the amount of such funding obligation, if not
previously paid.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Business transaction means a merger; consolidation; sale of
assets, equipment, or facilities; termination of a division, department,
-12-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
section, or subgroup of the entity; or any other business transaction
that results in termination of some or all of the entity's workforce; and
(ii) Funding obligation means the financial liability of the
retirement system to provide benefits for the affected plan members
incurred by the retirement system due to the entity's business
transaction calculated using the methodology and assumptions recommended
by the board's contracted actuary and approved by the board. The
methodology and assumptions used must be structured in a way that ensures
the entity is financially liable for all the costs of the entity's
business transaction, and the retirement system is not financially liable
for any of the cost of the entity's business transaction.
(e) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection including, but not limited to, the methods of
notifying the board of pending business transactions, the acceptable
methods of payment, and the timing of such payment.
(5) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a full-
time employee may apply to the board for vesting credit for years of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of
participation in the other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must
have been a full-time employee, as defined in the Nebraska governmental
plan in which the credit was earned. The board may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing the assessment and granting of vesting
credit.
(6) Any employee who qualifies for membership in the retirement
system pursuant to this section may not be disqualified from membership
in the retirement system solely because such employee also maintains
separate employment which qualifies the employee for membership in
another public retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement
system disqualify such an employee from membership in another public
retirement system solely by reason of separate employment which qualifies
-13-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
such employee for membership in this retirement system.
(7) A full-time or part-time employee of a city, village, or
township who becomes a county employee pursuant to a merger of services
shall receive vesting credit for his or her years of participation in a
Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by section 414(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code, of the city, village, or township.
(8) A full-time or part-time employee of a city, village, fire
protection district, or township who becomes a municipal county employee
shall receive credit for his or her years of employment with the city,
village, fire protection district, or township for purposes of the
vesting provisions of this section.
(9) A full-time or part-time employee of the state who becomes a
county employee pursuant to transfer of assessment function to a county
shall not be deemed to have experienced a termination of employment and
shall receive vesting credit for his or her years of participation in the
State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska.
(10) Counties shall ensure that employees authorized to participate
in the retirement system pursuant to this section shall enroll and make
required contributions to the retirement system immediately upon becoming
an employee. Information necessary to determine membership in the
retirement system shall be provided by the employer.
Sec. 8. Section 24-703.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
24-703.01 No judge shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system provided for in the Judges Retirement Act unless the
judge is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United
States. The court and the judge shall maintain at least one approved
identification document, as defined in section 1 of this act, of the
following documents which shall be unexpired, if applicable to the
particular document, to demonstrate such United States citizenship or
lawful presence in the United States as of the judge's date of hire. The
-14-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
court or judge shall and produce any such document so maintained upon
request of the board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement
Systems. :
(1) A state-issued driver's license;
(2) A state-issued identification card;
(3) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(4) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(5) A United States passport;
(6) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(7) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(8) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(9) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(10) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(11) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(12) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the board.
Sec. 9. Section 48-628.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-628.04 (1) An individual shall be disqualified for unemployment
benefits for any week if the services upon which such benefits are based
are performed by an alien. This section shall apply unless such alien:
(a) Is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent
residence at the time such services were performed;
-15-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
(b) Was lawfully present for purposes of performing such services;
or
(c) Was an eligible alien and was employed as a law enforcement
officer, as such terms are defined in section 1 of this act; or
(d) (c) Was permanently residing in the United States under color of
law at the time such services were performed, including an alien who was
lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of
section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C.
1182(d)(5).
(2) Any data or information required of individuals applying for
benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of
their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for
benefits. In the case of an individual whose application for benefits
would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such
individual are not payable because of his or her alien status shall be
made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.
Sec. 10. Section 79-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-915 (1) Persons residing outside of the United States and engaged
temporarily as school employees in the State of Nebraska shall not become
members of the retirement system.
(2) No school employee shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system provided for in the School Employees Retirement Act
unless the employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in
the United States. The employing public school and the school employee
shall maintain at least one approved identification document, as defined
in section 1 of this act, of the following documents which shall be
unexpired, if applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate such
United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States as of
the employee's date of hire. The school or employee shall and produce any
such document so maintained upon request of the retirement board or the
-16-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the retirement board.
(3)(a) The board may determine that a governmental entity currently
participating in the retirement system no longer qualifies, in whole or
in part, under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code as a
participating employer in a governmental plan.
(b)(i) To aid governmental entities in their business decisionmaking
process, any governmental entity currently participating in the
retirement system contemplating a business transaction that may result in
such entity no longer qualifying, in whole or in part, under section
414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code may notify the board in writing as
-17-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
soon as reasonably practicable, but no later than one hundred eighty days
before the transaction is to occur.
(ii) The board when timely notified shall, as soon as is reasonably
practicable, obtain from its contracted actuary the cost of any actuarial
study necessary to determine the potential funding obligation. The board
will notify the entity of such cost.
(iii) If such entity pays the board's contracted actuary pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c)(vi) of this section for any actuarial study necessary
to determine the potential funding obligation, the board shall, as soon
as reasonably practicable following its receipt of the actuarial study,
(A) determine whether the entity's contemplated business transaction will
cause the entity to no longer qualify under section 414(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code, (B) determine whether the contemplated business
transaction constitutes a plan termination by the entity, (C) determine
the potential funding obligation, (D) determine the administrative costs
that will be incurred by the board or the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's removal from the
retirement system, and (E) notify the entity of such determinations.
(iv) Failure to timely notify the board pursuant to subdivision (3)
(b)(i) of this section may result in the entity being treated as though
the board made a decision pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(c) If the board makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (3)
(a) of this section, or if the entity engages in the contemplated
business transaction reviewed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section
that results in the entity no longer qualifying under section 414(d) of
the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) The board shall notify the entity that it no longer qualifies
under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code within ten business
days after the determination;
(ii) The affected plan members shall be immediately considered fully
vested;
-18-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
(iii) The affected plan members shall become inactive within ninety
days after the board's determination;
(iv) The entity shall pay to the School Retirement Fund an amount
equal to any funding obligation;
(v) The entity shall pay to the Expense Fund an amount equal to any
administrative costs incurred by the board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's removal from
the retirement system; and
(vi) The entity shall pay directly to the board's contracted actuary
an amount equal to the cost of any actuarial study necessary to aid the
board in determining the amount of such funding obligation, if not
previously paid.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Business transaction means a merger; consolidation; sale of
assets, equipment, or facilities; termination of a division, department,
section, or subgroup of the entity; or any other business transaction
that results in termination of some or all of the entity's workforce; and
(ii) Funding obligation means the financial liability of the
retirement system to provide benefits for the affected plan members
incurred by the retirement system due to the entity's business
transaction calculated using the methodology and assumptions recommended
by the board's contracted actuary and approved by the board. The
methodology and assumptions used must be structured in a way that ensures
the entity is financially liable for all the costs of the entity's
business transaction, and the retirement system is not financially liable
for any of the cost of the entity's business transaction.
(e) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection including, but not limited to, the methods of
notifying the board of pending business transactions, the acceptable
methods of payment, and the timing of such payment.
Sec. 11. Section 79-9,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-19-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
amended to read:
79-9,118 No employee shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system unless the employee is a United States citizen or is
lawfully present in the United States. The employing public school and
the school employee shall maintain at least one approved identification
document, as defined in section 1 of this act, of the following documents
which shall be unexpired, if applicable to the particular document, to
demonstrate such United States citizenship or lawful presence in the
United States as of the employee's date of hire. The school or employee
shall , and, beginning September 1, 2024, produce any such document so
maintained upon request of the retirement board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems. :
(1) A state-issued driver's license;
(2) A state-issued identification card;
(3) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(4) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(5) A United States passport;
(6) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(7) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(8) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(9) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(10) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(11) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(12) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
-20-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved (a) until September 1, 2024, by the board of trustees and (b)
beginning September 1, 2024, by the retirement board.
Sec. 12. Section 81-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1401 For purposes of sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Class I railroad means a rail carrier classified as Class I
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part 1201 1-1;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(3) Council means the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council;
(4) Director means the director of the Nebraska Law Enforcement
Training Center;
(5) Eligible alien has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act;
(6) (5) Felony means a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term
of more than one year or a crime committed outside of Nebraska which
would be punishable by imprisonment for a term of more than one year if
committed in Nebraska;
(7) (6) Handgun means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen
inches in length or any firearm designed to be held and fired by the use
of a single hand;
(8) (7) Law enforcement agency means the police department or the
town marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of sheriff in
unincorporated areas, the Nebraska State Patrol, and Class I railroad
police departments;
(9)(a) (8)(a) Law enforcement officer means any person who has
successfully completed an entry-level law enforcement certification from
a training academy and who is responsible for the prevention or detection
of crime or the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the
state or any political subdivision of the state for more than one hundred
-21-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
hours per year and is authorized by law to make arrests and includes, but
is not limited to:
(i) A full-time or part-time member of the Nebraska State Patrol;
(ii) A county sheriff;
(iii) A full-time or part-time employee of a county sheriff's
office;
(iv) A full-time or part-time employee of a municipal or village
police agency;
(v) A full-time or part-time Game and Parks Commission conservation
officer;
(vi) A full-time or part-time deputy state sheriff;
(vii) A full-time employee of an organized and paid fire department
of any city of the metropolitan class who is an authorized arson
investigator and whose duties consist of determining the cause, origin,
and circumstances of fires or explosions while on duty in the course of
an investigation;
(viii) A member of a law enforcement reserve force appointed in
accordance with section 81-1438; or
(ix) A full-time Class I railroad police officer;
(b) Law enforcement officer includes a noncertified conditional
officer;
(c) Law enforcement officer does not include employees of the
Department of Correctional Services, probation officers under the
Nebraska Probation System, parole officers appointed by the Director of
Supervision and Services of the Division of Parole Supervision, or
employees of the Department of Revenue under section 77-366; and
(d) Except for a noncertified conditional officer, a law enforcement
officer shall possess a valid law enforcement officer certificate or
diploma, as established by the council, in order to be vested with the
authority of this section;
(10) (9) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning
-22-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
as in section 28-1206;
(11) (10) Noncertified conditional officer means a person appointed
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 81-1414;
(12) (11) Serious misconduct means improper or illegal actions taken
by a law enforcement officer that have a rational connection with the
person's fitness or capacity to serve as a law enforcement officer and
includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence;
(b) Fabrication of evidence;
(c) Repeated substantiated allegations of the use of excessive
force;
(d) Acceptance of a bribe;
(e) Commission of fraud or perjury; or
(f) Sexual assault;
(13) (12) Training academy means:
(a) The training center; or
(b) Another council-approved law enforcement training facility
which:
(i) Offers certification training that meets or exceeds the
certification training curriculum of the training center; and
(ii) Is operated and maintained by a law enforcement agency or by
multiple law enforcement agencies pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation
Act;
(14) (13) Training center means the Nebraska Law Enforcement
Training Center; and
(15) (14) Training school means a public or private institution of
higher education, including the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska
state colleges, and the community colleges of this state, that offers
training in a council-approved pre-certification course.
Sec. 13. Section 81-1410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-23-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
amended to read:
81-1410 (1) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing the minimum admission requirements for all training
academies. Until the rules and regulations become effective, the
admission requirements existing on July 13, 2000, pertaining to the
training center shall be applicable to all training academies, except the
Nebraska State Patrol. The rules and regulations shall establish
admission criteria which shall include, but not be limited to, (a)
physical, mental, and emotional fitness and (b) disclosure of any
criminal history. The council may also adopt a priority system for
admission to the training center and the other training academies
conducting certification training for officers not employed by that
training academy's agency.
(2) The council may admit an applicant to any training academy for
entry-level law enforcement certification when the applicant meets the
following minimum criteria:
(a) The applicant (i) is or will be a citizen of the United States
prior to the completion of certification or (ii) is an eligible alien;
(b) The applicant will reach the age of twenty-one years prior to
the completion of the training;
(c) The applicant has been fingerprinted and a search has been made
of local, state, and national fingerprint files for disclosure of any
criminal record and the results furnished to the training center;
(d) The applicant has a valid motor vehicle operator's or
chauffeur's license;
(e) The applicant has vision correctable to 20/30 and has no
evidence of an irreversible disease which will affect the person's sight;
(f) The applicant has been pardoned or has never been convicted by
any state or the United States of a crime punishable by imprisonment in a
penitentiary for a term of one year or more or by any foreign government
of a crime which would be punishable by imprisonment for a term of one
-24-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
year or more if committed in Nebraska or has had a conviction for such an
offense overturned or reversed by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(g) The applicant possesses good character as determined by a
thorough background investigation;
(h) The applicant (i)(A) is a high school graduate or (B) possesses
a general educational development certificate and (ii) is able to read,
write, and understand the English language at the eleventh grade level;
(i) The applicant has not been convicted of driving while
intoxicated in the two years immediately preceding admission; and
(j) The applicant has been examined by a licensed physician one year
or less prior to admission and has been certified by the physician to
have met the physical requirements, as determined by the council,
necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of a law enforcement officer
and successfully complete the requirements for training.
(3) In all cases in which it is necessary to acquire documents or
other information to determine whether or not an applicant meets any of
the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, such copies or other
information shall be supplied by the applicant at his or her own expense.
Sec. 14. Section 81-2016, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2016 (1) Every member of the Nebraska State Patrol who was
employed by the State of Nebraska as such, on September 7, 1947, and
every person employed as a member of such patrol thereafter, shall be a
member of the system, except for those members of the Nebraska State
Patrol who elected pursuant to section 60-1304 to remain members of the
State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska.
(2)(a) (2) No employee shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system provided for in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement
Act unless the employee is (i) a United States citizen, (ii) or is
lawfully present in the United States, or (iii) an eligible alien
employed as a law enforcement officer, as such terms are defined in
-25-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
section 1 of this act.
(b) The employing state agency and the employee shall maintain at
least one approved identification document, as defined in section 1 of
this act, of the following documents which shall be unexpired, if
applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate such United States
citizenship, or lawful presence, or eligibility in the United States as
of the employee's date of hire. The state agency or employee shall and
produce any such document so maintained upon request of the board or the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the board.
(3) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a member
-26-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
may apply to the board for eligibility and vesting credit for years of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of
participation in the other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must
have been a full-time employee, as defined in the Nebraska governmental
plan in which the credit was earned.
(4) Any officer who qualifies for membership pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section may not be disqualified from membership in the
retirement system solely because such officer also maintains separate
employment which qualifies the officer for membership in another public
retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement system
disqualify such an officer from membership in another public retirement
system solely by reason of separate employment which qualifies such
officer for membership in this retirement system.
(5) Information necessary to determine membership shall be provided
by the Nebraska State Patrol.
(6) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the assessment and granting of eligibility and vesting credit.
Sec. 15. Section 84-1307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1307 (1) The membership of the retirement system shall be
composed of all persons who are or were employed by the State of Nebraska
and who maintain an account balance with the retirement system.
(2) The following employees of the State of Nebraska are authorized
to participate in the retirement system: (a) All permanent full-time
employees who have attained the age of eighteen years shall begin
participation in the retirement system upon employment; and (b) all
permanent part-time employees who have attained the age of eighteen years
may exercise the option to begin participation in the retirement system
within the first thirty days of employment. An employee who exercises the
option to begin participation in the retirement system pursuant to this
-27-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
section shall remain in the retirement system until his or her
termination of employment or retirement, regardless of any change of
status as a permanent or temporary employee.
(3)(a) (3) No employee shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system provided for in the State Employees Retirement Act
unless the employee is (i) a United States citizen, (ii) or is lawfully
present in the United States, or (iii) an eligible alien employed as a
law enforcement officer, as such terms are defined in section 1 of this
act.
(b) The employing state agency and the employee shall maintain at
least one approved identification document, as defined in section 1 of
this act, of the following documents which shall be unexpired, if
applicable to the particular document, to demonstrate such United States
citizenship, or lawful presence, or eligibility in the United States as
of the employee's date of hire. The state agency or employee shall and
produce any such document so maintained upon request of the retirement
board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
-28-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the retirement board.
(4) For purposes of this section, (a) permanent full-time employees
includes employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who work
one-half or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period
of the legislative session and (b) permanent part-time employees includes
employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who work less than
one-half of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period of the
legislative session.
(5)(a) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a
full-time employee may apply to the board for vesting credit for years of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of
participation in the other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must
have been a full-time employee, as defined in the Nebraska governmental
plan in which the credit was earned. The board may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations governing the assessment and granting of vesting
credit.
(b) If the contributory retirement plan or contract let pursuant to
section 48-609, as such section existed prior to January 1, 2018, is
terminated, employees of the Department of Labor who are active
participants in such contributory retirement plan or contract on the date
of termination of such plan or contract shall be granted vesting credit
for their years of participation in such plan or contract.
(6) Any employee who qualifies for membership in the retirement
system pursuant to this section may not be disqualified for membership in
-29-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
the retirement system solely because such employee also maintains
separate employment which qualifies the employee for membership in
another public retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement
system disqualify such an employee from membership in another public
retirement system solely by reason of separate employment which qualifies
such employee for membership in this retirement system.
(7) State agencies shall ensure that employees authorized to
participate in the retirement system pursuant to this section shall
enroll and make required contributions to the retirement system
immediately upon becoming an employee. Information necessary to determine
membership in the retirement system shall be provided by the employer.
Sec. 16. Section 84-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1504 (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board, on behalf of the
state, may contract with any individual to defer a portion of such
individual's compensation or with the Legislative Council to defer any
other amount that the Legislative Council agrees to credit to an
individual's account pursuant to section 457 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(2) The compensation to be deferred at the election of the
individual and any other amount credited on behalf of such individual by
the Legislative Council shall not exceed the total compensation to be
received by the individual from the employer or exceed the limits
established by the Internal Revenue Code for such a plan.
(3) The deferred compensation program shall serve in addition to but
not be a part of any existing retirement or pension system provided for
state or county employees or any other benefit program.
(4) Any compensation deferred at the election of the individual
under such a deferred compensation plan shall continue to be included as
regular compensation for the purpose of computing the retirement,
pension, or social security contributions made or benefits earned by any
-30-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
employee.
(5) Any sum so deferred shall not be included in the computation of
any federal or state taxes withheld on behalf of any such individual.
(6) The state, the board, the state investment officer, the agency,
or the county shall not be responsible for any investment results entered
into by the individual in the deferred compensation agreement.
(7) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit, restrict, alter,
amend, invalidate, or nullify any deferred compensation plan previously
instituted by any instrumentality or agency of the State of Nebraska, and
any such plan is hereby authorized and approved.
(8)(a) (8) No employee of the state or any political subdivision of
the state shall be authorized to participate in a deferred compensation
plan unless the employee is (i) a United States citizen, (ii) or is
lawfully present in the United States, or (iii) an eligible alien
employed as a law enforcement officer, as such terms are defined in
section 1 of this act.
(b) The employing state agency or political subdivision of the State
of Nebraska and the employee shall maintain at least one approved
identification document, as defined in section 1 of this act, of the
following documents which shall be unexpired, if applicable to the
particular document, to demonstrate such United States citizenship, or
lawful presence, or eligibility in the United States as of the employee's
date of hire. The state agency, political subdivision, or employee shall
and produce any such document so maintained upon request of the Public
Employees Retirement Board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement
Systems. :
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
-31-

LB301 LB301
2025 2025
(d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(e) A United States passport;
(f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services granting employment authorization in the United States and
approved by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(9) For purposes of this section, individual means (a) any state
employee, whether employed on a permanent or temporary basis, full-time
or part-time, (b) a person under contract providing services to the state
who is not employed by the University of Nebraska or any of the state
colleges or community colleges and who has entered into a contract with
the state to have compensation deferred prior to August 28, 1999, and (c)
any county employee designated as a permanent part-time or full-time
employee or elected official whose employer does not offer a deferred
compensation plan and who has entered into an agreement pursuant to
section 48-1401.
Sec. 17. Original sections 4-109, 4-110, 4-113, 48-628.04, 79-915,
79-9,118, 81-1401, 81-1410, 81-2016, 84-1307, and 84-1504, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 4-108, 4-111, 4-112, 23-2306,
and 24-703.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-32-